test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_AS_STEM_3.yaml
# YAML file for Class CLASS_AS_STEM_3 verbs

Config:
 hfst:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
 xerox:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
  App: lookup

Tests:

    # CLASS_AS_STEM_3

     dándas+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: dándajaa
     dándas+V+INDIRECT+PAST: dándajaan
     dándas+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: dándajaas
     dándas+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: dándajaa.ang
     dándas+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: dándajaa'ahlang
     dándas+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: dándajaa'ahlanggaa
     dándas+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: dándajaa'ahlanggang
